src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_siammas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - siämmáš: # MLO, ok
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Nom: siämmáš             
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Gen: siämmáá
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Acc: siämmáá
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Ill: siämmážân
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Loc: siämmást
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Com: siämmáin
    siämmáš+A+Sg+Abe: siämmááttáá
    siämmáš+A+Ess: siämmážin                
    siämmáš+A+Par: siämmážid                
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Nom: siämmááh
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Gen: siämmái
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Acc: siämmáid
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Ill: siämmáid
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Loc: siämmáin
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Com: [siämmáiguin, siämmáigijn]
    siämmáš+A+Pl+Abe: siämmáittáá
